Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-2208
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Non-English-Speaking Workers Protection Act, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Actively recruit means any affirmative act, as defined by the department, done by or on behalf of an employer for the purpose of recruitment or hiring of non-English-speaking employees who reside more than five hundred miles from the place of employment;

(2) Commissioner means the Commissioner of Labor;

(3) Coordinator means the meatpacking industry worker rights coordinator appointed pursuant to section 48-2213;

(4) Department means the Department of Labor;

(5) Employ means to permit to work;

(6) Employee means any individual employed by any employer but does not include:

(a) Any individual employed in agriculture; or

(b) Any individual employed as a child care provider in or for a private home;

(7) Employer means any individual, partnership, limited liability company, association, corporation, business trust, legal representative, or organized group of persons employing one hundred or more employees at any one time, except for seasonal employment of not more than twenty weeks in any calendar year, or person acting directly or indirectly in the interest of an employer in relation to an employee but does not include the United States, the state, or any political subdivision thereof;

(8) Meatpacking operation means a business in which slaughtering, butchering, meat canning, meatpacking, meat manufacturing, poultry canning, poultry packing, poultry manufacturing, pet food manufacturing, processing of meatpacking products, or rendering is carried on;

(9) Meatpacking products includes livestock products and poultry products as such terms are defined in section 54-1902; and

(10) Non-English-speaking employee means an employee who does not speak, read, or understand English to the degree necessary for comprehension of the terms, conditions, and daily responsibilities of employment.

Laws 1995, LB 20, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1998), § 48-2201;

Laws 2003, LB 418, § 2.